Washington statutes.
RCW 19.250.010

Wireless subscriber must opt-in to any directory database—Disclosure requirement.

(1) A radio communications service company or any direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a radio communications service company shall not include the wireless phone number of any subscriber for inclusion in any directory of any form, nor shall it sell the contents of any directory database, without first obtaining the express, opt-in consent of that subscriber. The subscriber's consent must be obtained either in writing or electronically, and a receipt must be provided to the subscriber. The consent shall be a separate document or located on a separate screen or web page that has the sole purpose of authorizing a radio communications service company to include the subscriber's wireless phone number in a publicly available directory assistance database.

(2) In obtaining the subscriber's consent, the radio communications service company or direct or indirect affiliate or agent of a radio communications service company shall unambiguously disclose that, by consenting, the subscriber agrees to the following:

(a) That the subscriber's wireless phone number may be sold or licensed as part of a list of subscribers and that the wireless phone number may be included in a publicly available directory assistance database;

(b) That the subscriber may incur additional charges for receiving unsolicited calls or text messages; and

(c) That the subscriber's express, opt-in consent will be construed as consent for the subsequent publication of the wireless phone number to and by third parties in other directories or databases.

[ 2008 c 271 s 3; 2005 c 322 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 271: See note following RCW 19.250.005.